California statutes. Financial Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1407.

An overdraft of more than 90 days standing shall not be allowed as an asset of any bank.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1408.

A bank may act as a depositary, paying agent, trustee, or fiscal agent for the holding or handling of public funds or securities notwithstanding the fact that a member of the legislative body or an officer or employee of the depositor is an officer, employee, or stockholder of such bank, or of a holding company that owns any of the stock of such bank. Such member of a legislative body, or such officer or employee thereof, shall not be deemed “interested in any contract” as that phrase is
 used in Section 1090 of the Government Code, if his sole interest is the fact that he is an officer, employee, or stockholder of the bank selected to act as such depositary, paying agent or fiscal agent.

An officer or employee of a local public agency shall be deemed to have only a “remote interest” in a contract, as that phrase is used in Section 1091 of the Government Code, where such contract is entered into without competitive bidding under a procedure established by law, if his sole interest is that of an officer, director, or employee, of a bank, bank holding company, or savings and loan association with which a party to the contract has the relationship of borrower or depositor, debtor or creditor, and if the conditions of subdivision (a) of Section 1091 of the Government Code are met.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1409.

When a statement of account has been rendered by a bank to a depositor accompanied by vouchers, if any, which are the basis for debit entries in such account, such account shall, after the period of four years from the date of its rendition, in the event no objection thereto has been theretofore made by the depositor, be deemed finally adjusted and settled and its correctness conclusively presumed and such depositor shall thereafter be barred from questioning the correctness of such
 account for any cause.

A statement of account within the meaning of this section shall be deemed to have been rendered on a savings or time account when the bank, by making a notation in the depositor’s bank book or in some other manner reasonably calculated to give notice thereof to the depositor indicates that a certain sum is the correct balance of the account.

Nothing herein shall be construed to relieve the depositor from the duty now imposed by law of exercising due diligence in the examination of such account and vouchers, if any, when rendered by the bank and of immediate notification to the bank upon discovery of any error therein, nor from the legal consequences of neglect of such duty; nor to prevent the application of subsection (3) of Section 340 of the Code of Civil Procedure to cases governed thereby.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1410.

(a) No bank shall impose any charge on a savings account or on a depositor for the failure of a depositor to deposit, or for the late deposit of, any agreed periodic installment deposit into that account. A bank shall pay interest on savings accounts as to which a depositor has agreed to make periodic installment deposits at a rate of interest per annum that is not less than the lowest rate paid on other types of savings deposits.

(b) As used in this section “savings account” means a Christmas club account, a vacation club account, or other similar periodic installment deposit account maintained by a natural person, irrespective of its classification as a savings deposit or time deposit open account for purposes of state or federal law or regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1411.

(a) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “Customer” means one or more natural persons.

(2) “Debt” means an interest-bearing obligation or an obligation which by its terms is payable in installments, which has not been reduced to judgment, arising from an extension of credit to a natural person primarily for personal, family, or household
 purposes, and does not mean a charge for bank services or a debit for uncollected funds or for an overdraft of an account imposed by a bank on a deposit account.

(b) A bank is limited in exercising any setoff for a debt claimed to be owed to the bank by a customer in that a setoff shall not result in an aggregate balance of less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) as shown on the records of the bank for all demand deposit accounts maintained by a customer with the bank or any branch thereof.

(c) Not later than the day following the exercise of any setoff with respect to a deposit account for any debt claimed to be owed to the bank by a customer, the bank shall deliver to each customer personally or send by first-class mail postage prepaid to the address of each customer as shown on the records of the bank a written notice in at least 10-point type containing the following:

(1) A statement that the bank has set off a debt or a portion thereof against the customer’s deposit account, identifying the account, and giving the respective balances before and after the setoff.

(2) A statement identifying the debt set off against the account and giving the respective balances due before and after the setoff.

(3) A statement that if the customer claims that the debt has been paid or is not now owing, or that the funds in the deposit account consist of moneys expressly exempt pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 703.010) of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, and listed in the notice, the customer may execute and return the notice to the bank by mail at the address shown or personally to the bank branch where the customer’s account is maintained not later than 20
 days after the date of mailing or personal delivery.

(4) A statement that if the notice is executed and returned, the bank may file an action in court to collect the debt; that if a lawsuit is filed, the customer will be notified and have an opportunity to appear and defend; and that if the bank is successful, the customer will be liable for court costs, and attorney’s fees, if the debt so provides.

(5) A response form in at least 10-point type containing substantially the following:“The debt described in the Notice of Setoff received from the 
bank
 is ____ is not ____ my debt or the debt of another 
person in whose name the account is maintained. “I claim that the debt:has been paid.is not now owing.is not subject to setoff because the money in the account is: Paid earnings (CCP 704.070) Proceeds from execution sale of or insurance for loss 
of a motor vehicle (CCP 704.010) Proceeds from execution sale of household furnishings 
or other personal effects (CCP 704.020) Relocation benefits (CCP 704.180) Life insurance proceeds (CCP 704.100) Disability and health insurance benefits (CCP
 
704.130) Workers’ compensation benefits (CCP 704.160) Unemployment or strike benefits (CCP 704.120) Retirement benefits including, but not limited to, 
social security benefits (CCP 704.080, 704.110, 
704.115) Public assistance benefits including welfare payments 
and supplemental security income (SSI) or charitable 
aid (CCP
 704.170) Proceeds from sale of or insurance for damage or 
destruction of a dwelling (CCP 704.720, CCP 704.960) Proceeds from execution sale of or insurance for loss 
of tools of a trade (CCP 704.060) Award of damages for personal injury (CCP 704.140) 
or wrongful death (CCP 704.150) Financial aid paid by an institution of higher 
education to a student for expenses while attending 
school (CCP 704.190)
“I declare under penalty of perjury under the laws of the State of 
California that the foregoing is true and correct.Date: Signed: ” (Customer)(d) If the response form described in subdivision (c) executed by the customer is received by the bank not later than 20 days after the date of mailing or personal delivery of the written notice, the amount of the setoff for any debt claimed to be owed to the bank by a customer, and any bank service charges resulting from the setoff, shall be reversed and such amount shall be credited to the deposit account not later than the end of the business day following receipt of such executed response form.

(e) The limitations provided in this section do not apply to a deposit account, other than a demand deposit account, in which the bank has a
 security interest expressed by a written contract as collateral for the debt owing to the bank by the customer.

(f) The limitations provided in this section do not apply when a customer previously has authorized a bank in writing to periodically debit a deposit account as the agreed method of payment of the debt.

(g) The limitations provided in this section shall apply only to the exercise by a bank a setoff with respect to debts claimed to be owing to it by customers on or after July 1, 1976.

(h) Nothing in this section shall prejudice a person’s right to assert exemptions under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 703.010) of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, or to assert a claim or defense as to the validity of the debt, in a judicial proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1415.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Nonqualifying account” means a deposit account, other than a demand deposit account, that is not a qualifying account.

(2) “Qualifying account” means a deposit account, other than a demand deposit account, through which a bank’s depositors may obtain chances to win prizes in a savings promotion.

(3) “Savings promotion” means a contest or promotion to encourage savings deposits that is sponsored by one or more banks, or by a banking trade association or its subsidiary in conjunction with one or more banks, and in which bank depositors are offered a chance to win designated prizes.

(b) A bank may sponsor or participate in a savings promotion if all of the following requirements are satisfied:

(1) Bank depositors are not required to pay any fee or otherwise provide any consideration in order to enter the savings promotion.

(2) All material terms of, and fees charged by a bank in connection
 with, a qualifying account are comparable to those of comparable nonqualifying accounts offered by the bank.

(3) Each entry in the savings promotion has an equal chance of winning.

(4) Participants in the savings promotion are not required to be present at a prize drawing in order to win.

(c) For purposes of this section, a depositor’s deposit of at least a specified amount of money in a qualifying account, which is required in order to enter the savings promotion, is not consideration
 if the interest rate associated with the qualifying account is not reduced, as compared to comparable nonqualifying accounts offered by the bank, to account for the possibility of winning a prize.

(d) A savings promotion offered by a bank shall not be considered a lottery within the meaning of Section 319 or 319.3 of the Penal Code, or a raffle within the meaning of Section 320.5 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 847, Sec. 1.   (SB 1055)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Disclosure of Delayed Availability Policy [1420. - 1429.]

1420.

As used in this article:

(a) “Depository institution” means any of the following:

(1) Any insured bank as defined in Section 3 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1811 et seq.) or any bank which is eligible to make application to become an insured bank under Section 5 of the act.

(2) A mutual savings bank as defined in Section 3 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1811 et seq.) or any bank which is eligible to make application to become an insured bank under Section 5 of the act.

(3) A savings bank as defined in Section 3 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1811 et seq.) or any bank which is eligible to make application to become an insured bank under Section 5 of the act.

(4) An insured credit union as defined in Section 101 of the Federal Credit Union Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1751 et seq.) or any credit union which is eligible to make application to become an insured credit union pursuant to Section 201 of that act.

(5) Any member as defined in Section 2 of the Federal Home Loan Bank Act (12 U. S.C. Sec. 1421 et seq.).

(6) Any insured institution as defined in Section 401 of the National Housing Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1701 et seq.) or any institution which is eligible to make application to become an insured institution under Section 403 of that act.

(b) “Deposit account” means an account in a depository institution on which the account holder is permitted to make withdrawals from time to time in person by negotiable or transferable instrument, payment orders of withdrawal, telephone transfers, or other similar items for the purpose of making payments or transfers to third persons or others. The term includes demand deposits, negotiable order of withdrawal draft accounts, savings deposits subject to automatic transfers, share draft accounts, and all savings deposits and share accounts, other than time deposits.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1421.

(a) Prior to opening a deposit account a depository institution shall provide a written disclosure to the potential customer of its general policy with respect to when a customer may withdraw funds deposited by check or similar instrument into the customer’s deposit account.

(b) A depository institution shall furnish its customers preprinted deposit slips, envelopes for automatic teller machine
 deposits, or other individual notice bearing a conspicuous summary statement of its general policy with respect to when a customer may withdraw funds deposited by check or similar instrument into the customer’s deposit account; and, in the case of a particular deposit by check or similar instrument into a deposit account for which funds may not be immediately available for withdrawal, provide specific notice of the time the customer may withdraw such funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1422.

For the purposes of computing the amount of interest or dividends payable with respect to an interest-bearing deposit account, a depository institution shall not delay beginning to compute interest on funds deposited by check or similar instrument to such an account beyond the date on which that depository institution receives provisional credit for the check or similar instrument. However, the payment of interest with respect to funds deposited by check or similar instrument which is
 returned unpaid shall not be required.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1423.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, any depository institution which fails to comply with any requirement imposed pursuant to this article shall be liable to the aggrieved party in an amount equal to the sum of any actual damage sustained by the person as a result of the failure; and, in the case of an individual action an additional amount as the court may allow, except that the amount shall not be less than fifty dollars ($50) or greater than five hundred dollars ($500); or,
 in the case of a class action, such amount as the court may allow, except that as to each member of the class no minimum recovery shall be applicable, and the total recovery in any class action or series of class actions arising out of the same failure to comply by the same depository institution shall not be more than the lesser of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or 1 percent of the net worth of the depository institution; and, in the case of any successful action to enforce the foregoing liability, the costs of the action, together with a reasonable attorney’s fee as determined by the court.

In determining the amount of award in any class action, the court shall consider, among other relevant factors, the amount of any actual damages awarded, the frequency and persistence of failures of compliance, the resources of the depository institution, the number of persons adversely affected, and the extent to which the failure of compliance was intentional.

A depository institution may not be held liable in any action brought under this section for a violation of this article if the violation was not intentional and resulted from a bona fide error notwithstanding the maintenance of procedures reasonably adapted to avoid any such error. Examples of a bona fide error include, but are not limited to, clerical, calculation, computer malfunction and programming, and printing errors. An error of legal judgment with respect to a person’s obligations under this article shall not constitute a bona fide error.

Any action under this section may be brought in any court of competent jurisdiction, within one year from the date of the occurrence of the violation.

No provision of this section imposing any liability shall apply to any act done or omitted in good faith in conformity with any rule, regulation, or interpretation thereof by the Federal
 Reserve Board or in conformity with any interpretation or approval by an official or employee of the Federal Reserve System duly authorized by the board to issue interpretations or approvals under such procedures as the board may prescribe therefor, notwithstanding that after any act or omission has occurred, the rule, regulation, interpretation, or approval is amended, rescinded, or determined by judicial or other authority to be invalid for any reason.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1424.

The commissioner shall issue administrative regulations to define a reasonable time for permitting customers to draw on items received for deposit in the customer’s account. It is the public policy of this state to provide retail banking customers with the right to withdraw against items deposited with any depository institution located in this state within a reasonable period of time.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1425.

Pursuant to Section 1424, the commissioner shall promulgate regulations which shall be reviewed annually to establish a reasonable period of time within which a depository institution must permit a customer to draw as a matter of right on an item which has been received for deposit in the customer’s account.

In determining what constitutes a reasonable period of time the commissioner shall consider the following factors:

(a) The actual time for processing and transport between the depository and payer institutions.

(b) The fastest air transport time between depository and payer institutions to be used for purposes of setting the reasonable time for transport.

(c) The most expeditious route and means for processing of returned items.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1426.

The commissioner is authorized to gather from depository institutions such information as may be necessary for the formulation and promulgation of the regulations required by Section 1424.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1427.

The first regulations issued pursuant to this article shall be issued on or before July 1, 1984.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1428.

The commissioner is authorized to issue regulations which provide for a different period of time for withdrawal as a matter of right against deposited items, if there has been a determination that the application of the regulations adopted pursuant to this article would result in unsafe or unsound practices by a depository institution subject to the regulatory jurisdiction of the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1429.

(a) Funds deposited in an account at a depository institution shall be available on the second business day after the business day on which those funds are deposited in the case of a cashier’s check, certified check, teller’s check, or depository check subject to the following:

(1) The check is endorsed only by the person to whom it was issued.

(2) The check is deposited in a receiving depository institution that is staffed by individuals employed by that institution.

(3) The check is deposited with a special deposit slip that indicates it is a cashier’s check, certified check, teller’s check, or depository check, as the case may be.

(4) The check is deposited into an account in the name of a customer that has maintained any account with the receiving depository institution for a period of 60 days or more.

(5) The face amount of the check is for five thousand dollars ($5,000) or less.

In the case of funds deposited on any business day in an account at a depository institution by depository checks, the aggregate amount of which exceeds five thousand dollars ($5,000), this subdivision shall apply only
 with respect to the first five thousand dollars ($5,000) of the aggregate amount.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to a depository check if the receiving depository institution reasonably believes that the check is uncollectible from the originating depository institution. For purposes of this subdivision, “reasonable cause to believe” requires the existence of facts that would cause a well-grounded belief in the mind of a reasonable person. These reasons shall include, but not be limited to, a belief that (1) the drawer or drawee of the depository check has been, or will imminently be, the subject of an order for relief in bankruptcy or placed in receivership or (2) the depository check may be involved in a fraud or in a scheme commonly known as “kiting.” In these situations, the depository institution electing to proceed under this subdivision shall so notify the drawer and drawee no later than the close of the next business day following
 deposit of the depository check.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Account” means any demand deposit account and any other similar transaction account at a depository institution.

(2) “Business day” means any day other than a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday.

(3) “Cashier’s check” means any check that is subject to the following:

(A) The check is drawn on a depository institution.

(B) The check is signed by an officer or employee of the depository institution.

(C) The check is a direct obligation of the
 depository institution.

(4) “Certified check” means any check with respect to which a depository institution certifies the following:

(A) That the signature on the check is genuine.

(B) The depository institution has set aside funds that are equal to the amount of the check and will be used only to pay that check.

(5) “Depository check” means any cashier’s check, certified check, teller’s check, and any other functionally equivalent instrument, as determined by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System or the commissioner.

(6) “Depository institution” has the meaning given in clauses (i) to (vi), inclusive, of Section 19(b)(1)(A) of the Federal Reserve Act.

(7) “Teller’s check” means any check issued by a depository institution and drawn on another depository institution.

(d) Except for the specific circumstances and checks described in this section, this section is not intended to restrict or preempt the regulatory authority of the commissioner.

(e) In the event of a suspension or modification of any similar provisions in the federal Expedited Funds Availability Act, the effect of this section shall be similarly suspended or modified.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Dormant Accounts [1440. - 1440.]

1440.

Any bank which delivers or has heretofore delivered to the State Treasurer pursuant to law any unclaimed or abandoned deposit shall not thereafter be liable to any person for the same and any action which may be brought by any person against a bank for money so delivered to the State Treasurer shall be defended by the Attorney General without cost to the bank.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 13. Withdrawals and Collections [1450. - 1456.]



  ARTICLE 1. General [1450. - 1452.]

1450.

Notice to any bank of an adverse claim (the person making the adverse claim being hereafter called “adverse claimant”) to a deposit standing on its books to the credit of or to personal property held for the account of any person shall be disregarded, and the bank, notwithstanding the notice, shall honor the checks, notes, or other instruments requiring payment of money by or for the account of the person to whose credit the account stands and on demand shall deliver that property to, or on the order of, the person for whose account the property is held, without any liability on the part of the bank; subject, however, to the exceptions provided in subdivisions (a) and (b):

(a) If an adverse
 claimant delivers to the bank at the office at which the deposit is carried or at which the property is held an affidavit of the adverse claimant stating that of the adverse claimant’s own knowledge the person to whose credit the deposit stands or for whose account the property is held is a fiduciary for the adverse claimant and that the adverse claimant has reason to believe the fiduciary is about to misappropriate the deposit or the property, and stating the facts on which the claim of fiduciary relationship and the belief are founded, the bank shall refuse payment of the deposit and shall refuse to deliver the property for a period of not more than three court days (including the day of delivery) from the date that the bank received the adverse claimant’s affidavit, without liability on its part and without liability for the sufficiency or truth of the facts alleged in the affidavit.

(b) If at any time, either before, after, or in the absence of the filing of an affidavit by the adverse claimant, the adverse claimant procures and serves upon the bank at the office at which the deposit is carried or at which the property is held a restraining order, injunction, or other appropriate order against the bank from a court of competent jurisdiction in an action in which the adverse claimant and all persons in whose names the deposit stands or for whose account the property is held are parties, the bank shall comply with the order or injunction, without liability on its part.

(c) This section shall be applicable even though the name of the person appearing on the bank’s books to whose credit the deposit stands or for whose account the property is held is modified by a qualifying
 or descriptive term such as “agent,” “trustee,” or other word or phrase indicating that the person may not be the owner in his or her own right of the deposit or property.

(d) Nothing in the California Multiple-Party Accounts Law contained in Part 2 (commencing with Section 5100) of Division 5 of the Probate Code limits the applicability of this section.

(e) For purposes of this section, the term “office at which the deposit is carried” shall mean the branch, office, or other location where the account containing the subject deposit is carried or maintained.

(f) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), if a central location has been designated by the bank pursuant Section 684.115 of the Code of Civil Procedure for service
 of legal process, as that term is defined in Section 684.110 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the adverse claimant shall serve a notice of adverse claim or related affidavit, order, injunction, or other order contemplated herein at the central location. If a central location has not but should have been designated by the bank pursuant Section 684.115 of the Code of Civil Procedure for service of legal process, as that term is defined in Section 684.110 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the adverse claimant may serve a notice of adverse claim or related affidavit, order, injunction, or other order contemplated herein at any branch or office of the institution located in
 this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 484, Sec. 13.   (AB 2364)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1451.

When the depositor of a commercial or savings account has authorized any person to make withdrawals from the account, the bank, in the absence of written notice otherwise, may assume that any check, receipt, or order of withdrawal drawn by such person in the authorized form or manner, including checks drawn to his personal order and withdrawal orders payable to him personally, was drawn for a purpose authorized by the depositor and within the scope of the authority conferred upon such
 person.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1452.

A bank need not recognize or give any effect to (1) any claim to a deposit of cash or securities standing on its books to the credit of, or held by it for the account of, any corporation, firm or association in occupied territory or (2) any advice, statute, rule or regulation purporting to cancel or to give notice of the cancellation of the authority of any person at the time appearing on the books of such bank as authorized to withdraw or
 otherwise dispose of cash or securities of such corporation, firm or association, unless such bank is required so to do by appropriate process procured against it in a court of competent jurisdiction in the United States in a cause therein instituted by or in the name of such corporation, firm or association, or unless the person making such claim or giving such advice or invoking such statute, rule or regulation, as the case may be, shall execute to such bank, in form and with sureties acceptable to it, a bond indemnifying it from any and all liability, loss, damage, costs and expenses for and on account of recognizing or giving any effect to such claim, advice, statute, rule or regulation.

For the purposes of this section (1) the term “occupied territory” shall mean territory occupied by a dominant authority asserting governmental, military or police powers of any kind in such territory, but not recognized by the United States as the de jure
 government of such territory, and (2) the term “corporation, firm or association in occupied territory” shall mean a corporation, firm or association which has, or at any time has had, a place of business in territory which has at any time been occupied territory.

The provisions of this section shall be effective only in cases where (1) such claim or advice purports or appears to have been sent from or is reasonably believed to have been sent pursuant to orders originating in, such occupied territory during the period of occupation, or (2) such statute, rule or regulation appears to have emanated from such dominant authority and purports to be or to have been in force in such occupied territory during the period of occupation.

This section applies to claims, advices, statutes, rules or regulations given or invoked either before or after the effective date of
 this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Certified Checks [1455. - 1456.]

1455.

Whenever a bank certifies a check, the amount thereof shall be immediately charged against the account of the drawer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1456.

It shall be unlawful for any officer or employee of a bank to certify any check drawn upon such bank, unless the drawer has on deposit with the bank, at the time such check is certified, an amount to his credit on the books of the bank not less than the amount specified therein.

Any bank officer or employee who wilfully violates the provisions of this section or who resorts to any device or receives any fictitious obligations directly or
 indirectly in order to evade the provisions of this section is guilty of a felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 14. Loans and Investments [1460. - 1522.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [1460. - 1467.]

1460.

A commercial bank shall not rediscount, borrow money, or hypothecate its assets as security for money borrowed except to the extent and upon the conditions set forth in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1461.

Assets hypothecated by a commercial bank as security for moneys borrowed shall not exceed in value the amount borrowed by more than 50 percent except with the prior written consent of the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1462.

A commercial bank may borrow money by discounting or otherwise, and may borrow money secured by real property owned by the bank, to an amount not in excess of its shareholders’ equity, but shall not borrow money except as provided in Sections 1464 and 1465 in excess of such amount without the prior written approval of the commissioner.

The amounts of moneys so borrowed by a commercial bank together with the amount of any of its deposits secured
 by surety bonds shall not at any one time exceed the amount of its shareholders’ equity without the prior written approval of the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1463.

A commercial bank may hypothecate its assets in any manner provided by law to secure the deposits of moneys of the United States, of postal savings funds, of estates in bankruptcy cases, of the State of California, or of any political subdivision, public corporation, or district of the State of California. With the prior approval of the commissioner a bank may hypothecate its assets to secure moneys payable to other states.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1464.

A commercial bank may borrow for the purpose of buying from the United States, United States bonds, United States Treasury certificates, or notes or other obligations of the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1465.

A commercial bank may rediscount with, borrow money from, or hypothecate its assets as security for money borrowed from a Federal Reserve bank, the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, or the Federal Home Loan Bank.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1466.

A commercial bank may issue negotiable certificates of deposit transferable by endorsement and delivery and nonnegotiable certificates transferable only on the books of the bank.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1467.

A commercial bank located in a place the population of which does not exceed 5,000 persons according to the most recent official federal or state census may act as agent for any fire, life, or other insurance company authorized to do business in California by soliciting and selling insurance and collecting premiums and may receive for such services such fees and commissions as may be agreed upon with the insurance company if the bank is engaged in such business on October 1, 1949, and is
 duly licensed under the Insurance Code, and may act also as the broker or agent for others in making or procuring loans on real property located within 100 miles of the place in which the bank is located and may receive for such services a fee or a commission if it is engaged in such business on October 1, 1949, and is duly licensed. In engaging in either of such businesses the bank shall comply with all rules and regulations of the commissioner relating thereto and shall not guarantee either the principal or interest of any loan procured by it as broker or agent or assume or guarantee the payment of any premium on insurance policies written through it as agent or broker or guarantee the truth of any statement made by an insured in filing an application for insurance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Loan and Investment Limitations [1470. - 1473.]

1470.

(a) In this article and in Article 4 (commencing with Section 1710) of Chapter 19, “affiliate,” when used with respect to a specified person, means any person controlling, controlled by, or under common control with, the specified person, directly or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries.

(b) “Control” has the meaning set forth in Section 1250.

(c) “Regulated corporation” means any corporation or limited liability company or similar entity in which a bank makes an equity investment and which the bank controls.

(d) “Securities issued by a person” means any debt, equity, or other security issued by a person, and any and all affiliates of that person, issued for the benefit of that person or for the benefit of an affiliate of that person.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1471.

(a) Subject to the limitations and exceptions in Sections 1481 and 1510, a bank may hold both obligations made by a person, and securities issued by that same person.

(b) The total amount of obligations and securities held by a bank pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not exceed 25 percent of the sum of the shareholders’ equity, allowance for loan and lease losses, capital notes and debentures of the
 bank.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1472.
